Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-120
Department; contracts; authorized.

It may enter into any contracts necessary to the execution of the powers granted it by sections 3-101 to 3-154.

Laws 1945, c. 5, § 6(14), p. 87.